Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska42-914
Department; domestic violence; develop educational curriculum.

The department shall develop, in cooperation with the State Department of Education, a kindergarten through postsecondary educational curriculum relating to domestic violence.

Laws 1978, LB 623, § 14.